Utah statutes.
61-2b-20.   Renewal of license, certification, or registration.
(1)  To renew a license, certification, or registration, before the license,
certification, or registration expires, the holder of the license,
certification, or registration shall submit to the division in compliance with
procedures set by the division and the board:
(a)  an application for renewal;
(b)  a fee established by the division and the board, in accordance with
Section 63J-1-504; and
(c)  evidence in the form prescribed by the division of having completed the
continuing education requirements for renewal specified in this chapter.
(2) (a)  A license, certification, or registration expires if it is not
renewed on or before its expiration date.
(b)  For a period of 30 days after the expiration date, a license,
certification, or registration may be reinstated upon:
(i)  payment of a renewal fee and a late fee determined by the division and
the board; and
(ii)  satisfying the continuing education requirements specified in Section
61-2b-40.
(c)  After the 30-day period described in Subsection (2)(b), and until six
months after the expiration date, a license, certification, or registration
may be reinstated by:
(i)  paying a renewal fee and a reinstatement fee determined by the division
and the board; and
(ii)  satisfying the continuing education requirements specified in Section
61-2b-40.
(d)  After the six-month period described in Subsection (2)(c), and until one
year after the expiration date, a license, certification, or registration may
be reinstated by:
(i)  paying a renewal fee and a reinstatement fee determined by the division
and the board in accordance with Section 63J-1-504;
(ii)  providing proof acceptable to the division and the board of the person
having satisfied the continuing education requirements of Section 61-2b-40;
and
(iii)  providing proof acceptable to the division and the board of the person
completing 24 hours of continuing education:
(A)  in addition to the requirements in Section 61-2b-40; and
(B)  on a subject determined by the division by rule made in accordance with
Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(e)  The division shall relicense, recertify, or reregister a person who does
not renew that person's license, certification, or registration within one
year after the expiration date as prescribed for an original application.
(f)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), the division may extend the term of a
license, certification, or registration that would expire under Subsection
(2)(a) except for the extension if:
(i)  the person complies with the requirements of this section to renew the
license, certification, or registration; and
(ii)  at the time of the extension, there is pending under this chapter:
(A)  the application for renewal of the license, certification, or
registration; or
(B)  a disciplinary action.
(3)  A person who is licensed, certified, or registered under this chapter
shall notify the division of the following by sending the division a signed
statement within 10 business days of:
(a) (i)  a conviction of a criminal offense;
(ii)  the entry of a plea in abeyance to a criminal offense; or
(iii)  the potential resolution of a criminal case by:
(A)  a diversion agreement; or
(B)  any other agreement under which a criminal charge is suspended for a
period of time;
(b)  filing a personal bankruptcy or business bankruptcy;
(c)  the suspension, revocation, surrender, cancellation, or denial of a
professional license, certification, or registration of the person, whether
the license, certification, or registration is issued by this state or another
jurisdiction; or
(d)  the entry of a cease and desist order or a temporary or permanent
injunction:
(i)  against the person by a court or administrative agency; and
(ii)  on the basis of:
(A)  conduct or a practice involving an act regulated by this chapter; or
(B)  conduct involving fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit.
